Ohio, session 136, SB398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 1546.33 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1546.33. (A) The division of parks and watercraft shall establish and administer the adopt a trail program to allow volunteer groups to assist in maintaining and enhancing trails on state-owned land. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this section, volunteer groups in the program may adopt any available trail or trail segment to engage in any of the following activities: (1) Spring cleanup; (2) Litter collection; (3) Accessibility projects; (4) Special events; (5) Trail maintenance, enhancement, or realignment; (6) Public information and assistance; (7) Training. (C)(1) Volunteer groups seeking to participate in the program shall apply to the chief of the division of parks and watercraft on a form prescribed by the chief. The chief shall approve or deny such application. (2) No volunteer group shall perform any activity on a trail or trail segment without approval from the chief. If the chief approves participation in the program, the chief shall enter into a written agreement with a representative of the volunteer group. The chief may allow more than one volunteer group to adopt one specific trail or trail segment. (D) The chief shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the operation and implementation of the program. The rules also shall establish requirements governing any agreement entered into in accordance with division (C)(2) of this section, including a requirement that the agreement contain all of the following: (1) A provision that requires a volunteer group to participate in the program for a minimum of two years; (2) A provision that specifies any required trail assistance or maintenance when applicable; (3) A provision that requires compliance with all federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and ordinances. (E) Volunteer groups shall consist of people who are eighteen years of age or older. Participants seventeen years of age or younger shall be accompanied by an adult who is at least eighteen years of age. (F) No volunteer group shall perform on any trail either of the following: (1) Activities that reduce hours or compensation of a department of natural resources employee; (2) Activities that are inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement. (G) If the division operates other programs in the vicinity of a trail adopted by a volunteer group, the division shall coordinate such programs to allow volunteer groups to participate. (H) The division may identify adopted trails with a sign at a location along the adopted section after a volunteer group completes fifty hours of service. The sign shall bear the name of the volunteer group and the adopt a trail logo, which shall be created by the division. (I) The division shall coordinate with the closest solid waste management district to ensure that trash and debris are properly disposed of with proper documentation. (J) Volunteer groups shall place collected litter at designated locations approved by the division. The division may coordinate with volunteers, local authorities, and state agencies for the removal and disposal of collected litter. (K) The division may provide garbage bags, safety training, and gloves to volunteer groups in the program.